California statutes. Water Code
The taxable property in the annexed areas shall be subject to taxation after the annexation thereof for the purposes of the improvement district, including the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds and other obligations of the improvement district authorized and outstanding at the time of the annexation. If the terms and conditions established by the board specifically so provide, the taxable property in the annexed area shall be subject to taxation as if the annexed property had always been a part of the improvement district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 71.)
-------------------------------------------

72688.

The board may do all things necessary to enforce and make effective the terms and conditions of annexation fixed by it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72689.

Any action or proceeding in which the validity of an annexation to an improvement district pursuant to this article is contested, questioned, or denied shall be commenced within three months after the date of the resolution approving such annexation; otherwise the annexation shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Inclusion Proceedings Initiated by the Board [72700. - 72711.]

72700.

The board, by resolution, may initiate proceedings for the annexation of territory within the district whether contiguous or not to an improvement district to such improvement district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 132.)
-------------------------------------------

72701.

The resolution proposing annexation shall:

(a) Declare that proceedings have been initiated by the board pursuant to this article.

(b) State the reason for proposing the annexation.

(c) Set forth a description of the area proposed to be annexed, which may be made by reference to a map on file with the secretary of the district which map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the area proposed to be annexed. 

(d) State the terms and conditions of the annexation.

(e) State that the holders of title to any of the land sought to be annexed may file written protests with the secretary to the annexation or the annexation upon such terms and conditions.

(f) Fix the time and place of a meeting at which the board will receive written protests theretofore filed with the secretary, receive additional written protests, and hear from any and all persons interested in the annexation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72702.

The text of the resolution proposing annexation shall be published, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, prior to the time of hearing in at least one newspaper printed and published in the district, if there is a newspaper published and printed in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72703.

A copy of the resolution proposing annexation shall also be posted in three public places within the improvement district and three public places in the area proposed to be annexed at least two weeks prior to the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72704.

The board shall proceed with the hearing at the time and place fixed therefor and may continue the hearing, if need be, from time to time. All interested persons will be heard at the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72705.

If written protests are filed by the holders of title of one-half of the value of the territory proposed to be annexed as shown by the last equalized assessment roll of each county in which the territory is situated, further proceedings shall not be taken, and the board shall refuse the annexation by a resolution so stating.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72706.

If written protest is not made by the owners of one-half of the value of the territory proposed to be annexed, and if, at the conclusion of the hearing, the board finds and determines from the evidence presented at the hearing that the area proposed to be annexed to an improvement district will be benefited thereby, and that the improvement district to which the area proposed to be annexed will also be benefited thereby and will not be injured thereby, the board may, by resolution, approve such annexation.

The resolution shall describe the territory annexed, which may be by reference to a map on file with the secretary, which map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the annexed area. The resolution shall also state the terms and conditions of annexation as theretofore determined by resolution of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72707.

If the board finds and determines that either the area proposed to be annexed to the improvement district will not be benefited thereby or that the improvement district to which the area is proposed to be annexed will not be benefited thereby and will be injured thereby, the board shall by resolution disapprove such annexation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72708.

From and after the date of the adoption of the resolution approving the annexation, the area described therein is added to and forms a part of the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72709.

The taxable property in the annexed area shall be subject to taxation after the annexation thereof for the purposes of the improvement district, including the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds and other obligations of the improvement district authorized and outstanding at the time of the annexation. If the terms and conditions established by the board specifically so provide, the taxable property in the annexed area shall be subject to taxation as if the annexed property had always been a part of the improvement district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 71.)
-------------------------------------------

72710.

The board may do all things necessary to enforce and make effective the terms and conditions of annexation fixed by it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72711.

Any action or proceeding in which the validity of an annexation to an improvement district pursuant to this article is contested, questioned, or denied shall be commenced within three months after the date of the resolution of the board approving the annexation of the territory to an improvement district; otherwise, the annexation shall be held valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Dissolution of Improvement Districts [72730. - 72738.]

72730.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 72738, whenever the board deems it necessary for any improvement district formed pursuant to this division to be dissolved, it shall by resolution declare its intention to dissolve the improvement district.

As used in this chapter, “improvement district” includes an uninhabited improvement district formed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 71920) of Part 7 of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1151.)
-------------------------------------------

72731.

The resolution of intention shall state:

(a) The reason why the improvement district should be dissolved.

(b) If the improvement district was formed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 71870) or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 71920) of Part 7 of this division, that no bonds have been issued for the improvement district or are outstanding.

(c) If the improvement district was formed pursuant to Part 8 (commencing with Section 72000) of this division, that no indebtedness or liability was incurred for the improvement district or is outstanding.

(d) That a map showing the exterior boundaries of the improvement district, with relation to the territory immediately contiguous thereto, is on file with the secretary and is available for inspection by any person or persons interested. 

(e) The time and place for a hearing by the board on the question of the dissolution of the improvement district.

(f) That at such time and place any person interested, including all persons owning property in the district or in the improvement district will be heard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72732.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by publishing a copy of the resolution, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, prior to the time fixed for the hearing in a newspaper circulated in the district, if there is a newspaper circulated in the district. Such notice shall also be given by posting a copy of the resolution in three public places within the improvement district for at least two weeks before the time fixed for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72733.

At the time and place fixed in the resolution of intention, or at any time or place to which the hearing is adjourned, the board shall proceed with the hearing. At the hearing any person interested, including all persons owning property in the district, or in the improvement district, may appear and present any matters material to the proposed dissolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72734.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the board shall by ordinance determine whether it is necessary to dissolve the improvement district. If so, the ordinance shall state that the exterior boundaries of the improvement district are set forth on a map on file with the secretary and shall declare the improvement district dissolved. The determinations made in the ordinance shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72735.

When the ordinance declaring an improvement district dissolved becomes effective, the dissolution of such improvement district is complete.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72736.

The taxable property within the boundaries of the dissolved improvement district shall continue to be taxed for any indebtedness of the district contracted for such dissolved improvement district until the indebtedness has been satisfied, to the same extent that such property would be taxable for such purpose if the dissolution had not occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72737.

Any action or proceeding in which the validity of the dissolution of an improvement district, or of any of the proceedings in relation thereto, is contested, questioned, or denied shall be commenced within three months from the effective date of the ordinance dissolving the improvement district; otherwise, the dissolution of the improvement district and, all proceedings in relation thereto, shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72738.

After a bond election has been held in an improvement district formed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 71870) of Part 7 of this division and less than two-thirds of the votes cast in such election were in favor of the measure the board may within one year of the date of such election call and hold another election as provided in Part 7 of this division for the purpose of resubmitting said measure to the electors of said improvement district. If said measure is not so resubmitted said improvement district, on the anniversary date of the election, is dissolved without further action by the board. If said measure is resubmitted and fails to receive more than two-thirds of the votes cast in such election in favor of said measure said improvement district is dissolved following the canvass of the election returns.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1151.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Consolidation of Improvement Districts [72740. - 72741.2.]

72740.

Two or more improvement districts formed for a purpose other than the incurring of bonded indebtedness, whose powers and purposes are limited to those specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 71680) of Chapter 3 of Part 5, and which are portions of the same district, may be consolidated for a purpose other than the incurring of bonded indebtedness, as provided in this chapter, whether their boundaries are contiguous or not.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 555, Sec. 4.   Effective August 22, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

72740.1.

Whenever the board intends to consolidate two or more improvement districts in accordance with this chapter, the board shall adopt a resolution of intention which states all of the following:

(a) The board intends to consolidate the improvement districts.

(b) The purpose for which the improvement districts are to be consolidated.

(c) The estimated expense of carrying out that purpose.

(d) Taxes for carrying out that purpose will be levied exclusively upon the taxable property in the consolidated improvement district.

(e) The board’s determination as to the apportionment to the land in the respective improvement districts to be consolidated of any outstanding indebtedness and liabilities as it deems equitable.

(f) The taxable property within the boundaries of each participating improvement district shall continue to be taxed and assessed for any indebtedness and liabilities of the district contracted for that participating improvement district to the same extent that the property would be taxable and assessable for that purpose if the consolidation did not occur.

(g) A map showing the exterior boundaries of the proposed consolidated improvement district, with relation to the territory immediately contiguous thereto, is on file with the secretary and is available for inspection by any person or persons interested.

(h) The time and place for a hearing by the board on the questions of the consolidation and extent of the proposed consolidated improvement district, the purpose for which the improvement districts is to be consolidated, the estimated expense of carrying out that purpose, and the board’s determination as to the apportionment of any outstanding indebtedness and liabilities in the respective improvement districts to be consolidated.

(i) The fact that at the hearing any person interested, including all persons owning property in the district or in the proposed consolidated improvement district, may be heard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 555, Sec. 4.   Effective August 22, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

72740.2.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by publishing a copy of the resolution of intention, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, prior to the time fixed for the hearing, in a newspaper circulated in the improvement districts to be consolidated. The notice shall also be given by posting a copy of the resolution of intention in three public places within each of the improvement districts to be consolidated for at least two weeks before the time fixed for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 555, Sec. 4.   Effective August 22, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

72740.3.

At the time and place fixed in the resolution of intention, or at any time or place to which the hearing is adjourned, the board shall proceed with the hearing. At the hearing, any person interested, including any person owning property in each improvement district or in the proposed consolidated improvement district, may appear and present any matters material to the questions set forth in the resolution of intention.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 555, Sec. 4.   Effective August 22, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

72740.4.

At the conclusion of the hearing, if the board determines that it is necessary to consolidate the improvement districts, the board shall adopt a resolution of consolidation which states all of the following:

(a) The board deems it necessary to consolidate the improvement districts.

(b) The purpose for which the improvement districts are to be consolidated.

(c) The estimated expense of carrying out that purpose.

(d) Taxes for carrying out that purpose will be levied exclusively upon the taxable property in the consolidated improvement district.

(e) The board’s determination as to the apportionment to the land in the respective improvement districts to be consolidated of any outstanding indebtedness and liabilities as it deems equitable.

(f) The taxable property within the boundaries of each participating improvement district shall continue to be taxed and assessed for any indebtedness and liabilities of the district contracted for that participating improvement district, to the same extent that the property would be taxable and assessable for that purpose if the consolidation had not occurred.

(g) The exterior boundaries of the consolidated improvement district are set forth on a map on file with the secretary, which map shall govern all details as to the extent of the consolidated improvement district.

(h) The portion of the district set forth on the map shall thereupon constitute and be known as “Improvement District (A, B, C, or other letter designation) ____ of ____ Municipal Water District.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 555, Sec. 4.   Effective August 22, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

72740.5.

A copy of the resolution of consolidation shall be published, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, in a newspaper circulated in the improvement districts being consolidated. A copy of the resolution shall also be posted in three public places within each of the improvement districts being consolidated for at least two weeks.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 555, Sec. 4.   Effective August 22, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

72740.6.

The determinations made in the resolution of consolidation shall be final and conclusive, and the resolution of consolidation shall be effective on the 91st day after completion of the publication and posting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 555, Sec. 4.   Effective August 22, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

72740.7.

Upon completion of the consolidation, a statement of consolidation, certified by the secretary of the district, shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 555, Sec. 4.   Effective August 22, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

72740.8.

After the consolidation of the improvement districts pursuant to this chapter, all taxes levied for the carrying out of its purpose shall be levied exclusively upon the taxable property in the consolidated improvement district. The taxable property within the boundaries of each participating improvement district shall continue to be taxed for any indebtedness and liabilities of the district contracted for that participating improvement district, to the same extent that the property would be taxable for that purpose if the consolidation had not occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 555, Sec. 4.   Effective August 22, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

72740.9.

When consolidated, the consolidated improvement district, under the name specified for it in the resolution of consolidation, succeeds to all of the rights, privileges, functions, and properties of all of the improvement districts participating in the consolidation, is subject to all of their indebtedness as respectively apportioned, and is subject to the same limitations that are applicable to each participating improvement district to levy taxes and to impose fees and assessments, within their respective areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 555, Sec. 4.   Effective August 22, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

72741.

When consolidated, the consolidated improvement district possesses all of the powers of, is governed by, and is subject to all of the provisions of this division, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, as though originally formed pursuant to Part 8 (commencing with Section 75350).

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 555, Sec. 4.   Effective August 22, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

72741.1.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall impair the rights of creditors of an improvement district participating in the consolidation, and each creditor may enforce against and through the consolidated improvement district all the creditor’s rights against any improvement district participating in the consolidation in the same manner and with the same effect, except for the substitution of the consolidated improvement district for the improvement district participating in the consolidation, as if the consolidation had never been effected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 555, Sec. 4.   Effective August 22, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

72741.2.

Any action or proceeding in which the validity of the consolidation of the improvement districts, or of any of the proceedings in relation thereto, is contested, questioned, or denied, shall be commenced within three months from the effective date of the resolution of consolidation; otherwise, the consolidation of the improvement districts and all proceedings in relation thereto, shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 555, Sec. 4.   Effective August 22, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 11.5. MARIN MUNICIPAL WATER DISTRICT [72750. - 72760.]



  CHAPTER 1. Supplemental Water Supplies [72750. - 72750.]

72750.

The Marin Municipal Water District, in addition to or in conjunction with any provision of this division, may do any of the following in order to implement the acquisition, storage, transportation, and distribution of water for such district:

(a) Fix such rates for water in the district, and in each improvement district therein, as will result in revenues which will pay the amounts payable by the district without limitation, pursuant to contracts or leases entered into by the district.

(b) Contract with any person, political subdivision, public corporation or agency, for the purchase of water and water supply, or for the right to use, or for capacity in, all or any part of water storage, transportation, or distribution facilities, existing waterworks or a waterworks system.

(c) Lease from any person, political subdivision, public corporation or agency, with the privilege of purchasing or otherwise, all or any part of, or the right to use, or for capacity in, all or any part of water storage, transportation, or distribution facilities, existing waterworks, or a waterworks system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 771.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Taxes and Other Revenues [72755. - 72755.]

72755.

If the revenues of the district, or of any improvement district therein, are, or in the judgment of the board will probably be, inadequate for any cause to pay the principal of, or interest on, any bonded debt of the district, or any improvement district thereof, as it becomes due and also the amounts set forth in Section 71616, and also any amounts pursuant to contracts or leases referred to in this part applicable to the Marin Municipal Water District, the board shall cause a tax to be levied, sufficient to provide for such deficit and to pay the amount of such principal and interest that will become due before the proceeds of a tax levied at the next general tax levy will be available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 771.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Elections [72760. - 72760.]

72760.

The Marin Municipal Water District in Marin County shall not exercise any powers under this part by which the district incurs an indebtedness or liability exceeding in any year the income or revenue for that year, without the approval of a majority of the voters of the district voting at an election held within the district for that purpose. The election may be combined with any other election held within the district. If a majority of the votes cast at the election is in favor of the proposition, the county elections official shall immediately cause to be filed with the Secretary of State a certificate reciting that fact. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, Article 3 (commencing with Section 9160) of Chapter 2 of Division 9 of the Elections Code shall apply to that election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 266.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 11.6. Central Basin Municipal Water District [72770. - 72770.]

72770.

Notwithstanding Section 71274, no ordinance, motion, or resolution relating to the ethics, compensation, or benefits of the members of the Central Basin Municipal Water District board of directors shall be passed or become effective without the affirmative votes of two-thirds of the members of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 426, Sec. 2.   (SB 953)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 12. REPEALS [73000. - 73001.]

73000.

Chapter 671 of the Statutes of 1911 is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

73001.

The repeal effected by this part shall not be construed to deprive any district or person or any other entity of any substantial right which would have existed or hereafter exists had such repeal not been effected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 20.5. WHOLESALE REGIONAL WATER SYSTEM SECURITY AND RELIABILITY ACT [73500. - 73514.]

73500.

This division shall be known as and may be cited as the Wholesale Regional Water System Security and Reliability Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 841, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Repealed as of January 1, 2036, pursuant to Section 73514.)
-------------------------------------------

73501.

(a) Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this section govern the construction of this division.

(b) “Association” means the San Francisco Bay Area Water Users Association.

(c) “Bay area regional water system” means the facilities for the storage, treatment, and transmission of water located in the Counties of Tuolumne, Stanislaus, San Joaquin, Alameda, Santa
 Clara, and San Mateo, together with three terminal reservoirs in the city.

(d) “Bay area wholesale customers” means the 25 public agencies in the Counties of San Mateo, Alameda, and Santa Clara that purchase water from the city pursuant to the master water sales contract, including the Alameda County Water District, the City of Brisbane, the City of Burlingame, the Coastside County Water District, the City of Daly City, the City of East Palo Alto, the Estero Municipal Improvement District, Guadalupe Valley Municipal Improvement District, City of Hayward, the Town of Hillsborough, the City of Menlo Park, the Mid-Peninsula Water District, the City of Millbrae, the City of Milpitas, the City of Mountain View, the North Coast County Water District, the City of Palo Alto, the Purissima Hills Water District, the City of Redwood City, the City of San Bruno, the City of San Jose, the City of Santa Clara, the Skyline County Water District, the City of
 Sunnyvale, and the Westborough Water District, Stanford University, the California Water Service Company, and the Cordilleras Mutual Water Association.

(e) “City” means the City and County of San Francisco.

(f) “Master water sales contract” means the agreement entitled “Settlement Agreement and Master Water Sales Contract between the City and County of San Francisco and Certain Suburban Purchasers” entered into in 1984 by the city and the wholesale customers.

(g) “Regional water system” means facilities for the storage, treatment, and transmission of water owned and operated by a regional wholesale water supplier, other than the city.

(h) “Regional wholesale water supplier” means any city, county, or city and county, including the city, that operates a
 regional water system, and furnishes water on a wholesale basis to local government agencies and public utilities that, in turn, supply water to a combined population of 1.5 million or more residents of geographic areas outside the boundary of the regional wholesale water supplier.

(i) “Wholesale customers” means local government agencies and public utilities, including, but not limited to, the bay area wholesale customers, that purchase water from a regional wholesale water supplier and distribute that water to retail customers in their respective service areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 52, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Repealed as of January 1, 2036, pursuant to Section 73514.)
-------------------------------------------

73502.

(a) The city, on or before February 1, 2003, shall adopt the program of capital improvement projects designed to restore and improve the bay area regional water system that are described in the capital improvement program report prepared by the San Francisco Public Utilities Commission dated February 25, 2002. A copy of the program shall be submitted, on or before March 1, 2003, to the State Water Resources Control Board. The program shall include a schedule for the completion of design and award of contract, and commencement and completion of construction of each described project. The schedule shall require that projects representing 50 percent of the total program cost be completed on or before 2010 and that projects representing 100 percent of the total program cost be completed on
 or before 2015. The program shall also contain a financing plan. The city shall review and update the program, as necessary, based on changes in the schedule set forth in the plan adopted pursuant to subdivision (d).

(b) The plan shall require completion of the following projects:Project
Location
Project
 Identification
 Number1. Irvington Tunnel
 AlternativeAlameda/Santa 
Clara Counties99702. Crystal Springs Pump Station 
 & PipelineSan Mateo County2016713. BDPL 1 & 2-Repair of 
 Caissons/Pipe BridgeAlameda/San 
 Mateo Counties994. BDPL Pipeline Upgrades at 
 Hayward FaultAlameda
 County1285. Calaveras Fault Crossing 
 UpgradeAlameda County98976. Crystal Springs Bypass 
 PipelineSan Mateo County98917. BDPL Cross Connections 3 & 
 4Alameda/Santa 
Clara Counties2023398. Conveyance Capacity West of 
 Irvington TunnelAlameda/Santa 
Clara/San Mateo 
Counties2014419. Calaveras Dam Seismic 
 ImprovementsAlameda County202135 (c) The city shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Audit Committee, the Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission, and the State Water Resources Control Board, on or before September 1 of each year, describing the progress made on the implementation of the capital improvement program for the bay area regional water system during the previous fiscal year. The city shall identify in the report any project that is behind schedule, and, for each project so identified, shall describe the city’s plan and timeline for either making up the delay or adopting a revised schedule pursuant to subdivision (d).

(d) (1) The city may determine that completion dates for projects contained in the capital improvement program adopted pursuant to subdivision (a), including those projects described in subdivision (b), should be delayed or that different projects should be constructed.

(2) The city shall provide written notice, not less than 30 days before the date of a meeting of the city agency responsible for management of the bay area regional water system, that a change in the program is to be considered. The notice shall include information about the reason for the proposed change and the availability of materials related to the proposed change. All bay area wholesale customers shall be permitted to testify or otherwise submit comments at the meeting.

(3) If the city adopts a change in the program that
 deletes one or more projects from the program, or postpones the scheduled completion dates, the city shall promptly furnish a copy of that change and the reasons for that change to the State Water Resources Control Board and the Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission. The State Water Resources Control Board and the Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission shall each submit written comments with regard to the significance of that change with respect to public health and safety to the city and the Joint Legislative Audit Committee not later than 120 days after the date on which those entities received notice of that change.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 563.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2036, pursuant to Section 73514.)
-------------------------------------------

73503.

(a) The city, in consultation with the association and the offices of emergency services in Alameda County, Santa Clara County, and San Mateo County, shall prepare an emergency response plan describing how water service will be restored to the area served by the bay area regional water system after an interruption caused by earthquake or other natural or manmade catastrophe, and
 thereafter shall be implemented.

(b) During any interruption in supply caused by earthquake, or other natural or manmade catastrophe, a regional wholesale water supplier shall distribute water to customers on an equitable basis, to the extent feasible given physical damage to the regional water system, without preference or discrimination based on a customer’s geographic location within or outside the boundary of the regional wholesale water supplier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 618, Sec. 302.   (AB 2791)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2036, pursuant to Section 73514.)
-------------------------------------------

73504.

(a) Commencing in 2003, a regional wholesale water supplier shall submit a report to the Legislature and the State Water Resources Control Board on or before February 1 of each year, describing the progress made during the previous calendar year on securing supplemental sources of water to augment existing supplies during dry years.

(b) In order to supply adequately, dependably, and safely the requirements of all users of water, the city shall continue its practice of operating the reservoirs in the
 Counties of Tuolumne and Stanislaus in a manner that ensures that the generation of hydroelectric power will not cause any reasonably anticipated adverse impact on water service. The city shall assign higher priority to delivery of water to the bay area than to the generation of electric power, unless the Secretary of the Interior, in writing, notifies the city that doing so would violate the Raker Act (63 P.L. 41). The city shall make available to the public, on request, its plans of operations (rule curves) for these reservoirs.

(c) The city shall be deemed to be a local public agency for the purposes of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1810) of Chapter 11 of Part 2 of Division 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 203, Sec. 2.   (AB 2962)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2036, pursuant to Section 73514.)
-------------------------------------------

73505.

The State Department of Health Services shall conduct an audit, or arrange for an audit to be performed by contract, of the city’s program of maintenance of the bay area regional water system prior to July 1, 2004. The audit shall include both of the following:

(a) A review of the adequacy of the city’s procedures and resources for all of the following:

(1) Identifying needed maintenance.

(2) Planning, budgeting, scheduling, and completing maintenance.

(3) Recordkeeping of maintenance activities.

(b) A field investigation of the major facilities of the bay area regional water system to determine the general condition of those facilities and the adequacy of existing maintenance efforts.

(c) The State Department of Health Services shall submit a report to the city, the Joint Legislative Audit Committee, and the Seismic Safety Commission on its findings and recommendations based on the audit on or before January 1, 2005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 841, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Repealed as of January 1, 2036, pursuant to Section 73514.)
-------------------------------------------

73506.

The State Department of Health Services shall conduct an audit of the regional water systems operated by all regional wholesale water suppliers, other than the city, subject to this division and shall submit to the Legislature a report thereon on or before February 1, 2006.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 841, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Repealed as of January 1, 2036, pursuant to Section 73514.)
-------------------------------------------

73508.

If the city and the bay area wholesale customers that are public agencies form a special district with authority and responsibility to own, operate, and manage the bay area regional water system and whose governing board’s composition reflects the proportionate use of water delivered by the bay area regional water system within the city and within the aggregate geographic area served by the bay area wholesale customers, the obligations imposed on the city by this division shall be applicable to that district. The city shall be relieved of all
 obligations under this division at the time the ownership and control of the bay area regional water system are transferred to that district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 841, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Repealed as of January 1, 2036, pursuant to Section 73514.)
-------------------------------------------

73510.

Notwithstanding Section 116500 of the Health and Safety Code, the State Water Resources Control Board shall ensure that the bay area regional water system is operated in compliance with the California Safe Drinking Water Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 116270) of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code) and the guidelines established by the United States Environmental Protection Agency for the purposes of administering the comparable provisions of the federal Safe Drinking Water Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300f et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 186.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2036, pursuant to Section 73514.)
-------------------------------------------

73511.

A special district composed of some or all of the bay area wholesale customers may receive state funds for the purpose of protecting the bay area regional water system against seismic risk, without regard to whether the city is a member of that district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 841, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Repealed as of January 1, 2036, pursuant to Section 73514.)
-------------------------------------------

73512.
